Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4230.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13c. (1) The neighborhood road fund is created in the state treasury. (2) Subject to subsection (5), the state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (5) Beginning with the 2025-2026 state fiscal year through the 2029-2030 state fiscal year, $100,000,000.00 of the money received in the fund each state fiscal year under section 695 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.695, must be deposited and maintained in an account separate from all other money received in the fund. The local bridge advisory board shall expend money from the account described in this subsection on appropriation, only for the repair of closed, restricted, and critical bridges as determined by the local bridge advisory board. (6) The department shall expend the remainder of the money from the fund on appropriation, only to distribute the money to road agencies using the following formula: (a) Road agencies are divided into the following categories: (i) County road commissions. (ii) City and village road agencies. (b) The fund must be allocated to each category of road agency described in subdivision (a) in the same proportion that the mileage under each category of road agency bears to the total combined mileage under both categories of road agency. (c) The portion of the fund allocated to each category of road agency must be distributed to each individual road agency within that category as follows: (i) For county road commissions, as follows: (A) $100,000.00 must be distributed to each county road commission. (B) The amount remaining after the distribution in sub-subparagraph (A) must be distributed to each county road commission in the same proportion that the mileage under that individual county road commission bears to the total combined mileage under all county road commissions. (ii) For city and village road agencies, in the same proportion that the mileage under that individual city or village road agency bears to the total combined mileage under all city and village road agencies. (7) A county road commission shall use money distributed under this section only for the preservation, maintenance, routine maintenance, and preventative maintenance of the county local road system. (8) Matching funds shall not be required from a local unit of government or county road commission as a condition for the use of money distributed under this section. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Fund" means the neighborhood road fund created in subsection (1). (b) "Mileage" means either of the following: (i) For a county road commission, the number of miles of county urban local roads under the jurisdiction of that county road commission as determined under section 12b. (ii) For a city or village road agency, the number of miles of local roads under the jurisdiction of that city or village road agency. (c) "Preservation", "maintenance", "routine maintenance", and "preventative maintenance" mean those terms as defined in section 10c. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 4180. (b) House Bill No. 4181. (c) House Bill No. 4182. (d) House Bill No. 4183. (e) House Bill No. 4184. (f) House Bill No. 4185. (g) House Bill No. 4186. (h) House Bill No. 4187.